Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5319.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 45a. (1) Subject to subsection (2), a person shall not
knowingly and intentionally use an unmanned aircraft in a manner
that interferes with the operations of a key facility, a
correctional facility, or other a law enforcement facility, or any
other critical infrastructure.
(2) If a facility listed under subsection (1) is included on
the Federal Aviation Administration's registry of fixed site
facilities under section 2209 of the FAA extension, safety, and
security act of 2016, Public Law 114-190, a person shall not fly or
JJR H03694'25 (H-3) qewv1s


cause an unmanned aircraft to hover over the facility.
(3) Beginning 90 days after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this subsection, a person shall not fly
or cause an unmanned aircraft to hover over a key facility, a
correctional facility, a law enforcement facility, or any other
critical infrastructure. This subsection applies only to the extent
that this subsection is not preempted by federal law.
(4) Beginning 90 days after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this subsection, a person shall not
trespass on a key facility, a correctional facility, a law
enforcement facility, or any other critical infrastructure by
piloting an unmanned vehicle on land or in water that is part of a
key facility, or by causing an unmanned vehicle to trespass on land
or in water that is part of a key facility, correctional facility,
law enforcement facility, or critical infrastructure.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6), a person
who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of not more than
$500.00, or both.
(6) (3) A person who knowingly and with malicious intent
violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than 4 years, or a fine of not more than
$2,500.00, or both.
(7) (4) This section does not apply to a commercial operator
of an unmanned aircraft if the unmanned aircraft is operated
pursuant to and in compliance with Federal Aviation Administration
regulations, authorizations, and exemptions.any of the following:
(a) A public safety agency operating an unmanned aircraft or
other unmanned vehicle.
JJR H03694'25 (H-3) qewv1s


(b) A person authorized to access privately owned critical
infrastructure or a key facility operating an unmanned aircraft or
unmanned vehicle for the purpose of inspecting, maintaining,
repairing, constructing, or otherwise working on that critical
infrastructure or key facility.
(c) A person operating an unmanned aircraft or unmanned
vehicle over or on critical infrastructure or a key facility with
the consent of the owner or operator of the critical infrastructure
or key facility.
(8) (5) As used in this section:
(a) "Critical infrastructure" means that term as defined in
section 2 of the cyber civilian corps act, 2017 PA 132, MCL 18.222.
(b) (a) "Key facility" means that term as defined in section
552c.
(c) (b) "Unmanned aircraft" means that term as defined in
section 3 of the unmanned aircraft systems act, 2016 PA 436, MCL
259.303.
(d) "Unmanned vehicle" means a water- or land-based vehicle
that is piloted remotely, or autonomously through use of an on-
board computer, communication links, and any additional equipment
that is necessary for the vehicle to operate safely.
Final Page
JJR H03694'25 (H-3) qewv1s